Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1851.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 502(2) and (3) of the act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953, are amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 105 OF THE ACT OF JUNE 29, 1953 (P.L.304, NO.66), KNOWN AS THE VITAL STATISTICS LAW OF 1953, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 SECTION 105. GENERAL PROVISIONS: DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS ACT, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE--* * *(13) "MIDWIFE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED UNDER THE ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE "MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985."SECTION 2. SECTIONS 502(2) AND (3) AND 503 OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 502. Death and Fetal Death Registration: Information for Certificates.--In preparing a certificate of death or fetal death, the person in charge of interment or of removal of a dead body or fetal remains from the registration district shall obtain the required information. The following persons shall supply the information certified by their respective signatures:* * *(2) Subject to the limitation contained in clause (3), the medical certification, except in the event of a referral to the coroner pursuant to section five hundred three of this act, shall be supplied (i) in the case of a death, by the physician, certified registered nurse practitioner or physician assistant or (ii) dentist who is a staff member of an approved hospital who attended the deceased during the last illness, provided the death occurs in the hospital and the deceased had been admitted on the dental service, and (iii) in the case of a fetal death, by the attending physician, certified registered nurse practitioner [or], physician assistant or certified nurse midwife.(3) In all cases where the physician, certified registered 20250HB1851PN2716 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nurse practitioner, physician assistant, certified nurse midwife or dentist who would otherwise supply the medical certification is a member of the immediate family of the deceased, the case shall be referred to another physician, certified registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, certified nurse midwife or dentist who qualifies under clause (2) for a medical certification. In the event a qualified alternate physician, certified registered nurse practitioner, physician assistant, certified nurse midwife or dentist is unavailable or unwilling to provide the medical certification required by law, the case shall be referred to the coroner of the county wherein the death occurred or to a coroner of an adjacent county. In no event shall a coroner sign a certificate of death or fetal death for a deceased who was a member of his immediate family.SECTION 503. DEATH AND FETAL DEATH REGISTRATION: CORONER REFERRALS.--THE LOCAL REGISTRAR OR PERSON IN CHARGE OF INTERMENT OR OTHER PERSON HAVING KNOWLEDGE OF THE DEATH OR FETAL DEATH SHALL REFER TO THE CORONER THE FOLLOWING CASES: (1) WHERE NO PHYSICIAN, CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER, PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR DENTIST WHO IS A STAFF MEMBER OF AN APPROVED HOSPITAL WAS IN ATTENDANCE DURING THE LAST ILLNESS OF THE DECEASED OR IN THE CASE OF A FETAL DEATH WHERE THERE WAS NO ATTENDING PHYSICIAN, CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER [OR], PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR MIDWIFE OR (2) WHERE THE PHYSICIAN, CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER, PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR DENTIST WHO IS A STAFF MEMBER OF AN APPROVED HOSPITAL IN ATTENDANCE DURING THE LAST ILLNESS OF THE DECEASED OR THE ATTENDING PHYSICIAN, CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER [OR], PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT OR MIDWIFE IN THE CASE OF A FETAL DEATH IS PHYSICALLY UNABLE TO SUPPLY THE NECESSARY DATA, OR (3) 20250HB1851PN2716 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WHERE THE CIRCUMSTANCES SUGGEST THAT THE DEATH WAS SUDDEN OR VIOLENT OR SUSPICIOUS IN NATURE OR WAS THE RESULT OF OTHER THAN NATURAL CAUSES, OR (4) WHERE THE PHYSICIAN, CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE PRACTITIONER, PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT, MIDWIFE, DENTIST OR CORONER WHO PROVIDED OR WOULD PROVIDE THE MEDICAL CERTIFICATION IS A MEMBER OF THE IMMEDIATE FAMILY OF THE DECEASED. IN EVERY INSTANCE OF A REFERRAL UNDER THIS SECTION, THE CORONER SHALL MAKE AN IMMEDIATE INVESTIGATION AND SHALL SUPPLY THE NECESSARY DATA, INCLUDING THE MEDICAL CERTIFICATION OF THE DEATH OR FETAL DEATH. IN NO EVENT SHALL A CORONER SIGN A CERTIFICATE OF DEATH OR FETAL DEATH FOR A DECEASED WHO WAS A MEMBER OF HIS IMMEDIATE FAMILY.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1851PN2716 - 4 - <--12345678910111213